public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
inalberar/A
inalokar/A
inamorar/A
ansar/A
arđenar/A
inarpexar/A
asalar/A
exautorar/A
babar/A
xbaiƚar/A
inbaƚar/A
balkar/A
balotar/A
baƚuxenar/A
bañar/A
inbarbajar/A
barufar/A
dexbateđar/A
xbaŧegar/A
xbavidar/A
bekonar/A
xberxelar/A
bevusar/A
xbiaxemar/A
bindoƚar/A
biskolar/A
inbogar/A
dexbokar/A
inboƚoñar/A
xbonbardar/A
bordeƚar/A
inboskajar/A
dexboŧar/A
brakedar/A
xbranar/A
xbraŧolar/A
brilantar/A
inbrokar/A
inbrular/A
bueƚar/A
skonbusolar/A
xbuxinar/A
scarexar/A
acèñer/A
soscéñer/A
incodar/A
dexdir/A
indebitar/A
derokar/A
diƚadiar/A
indoar/A
dolsir/A
dexdopiar/A
adotar/A
dubitar/A
indalir/A
đèmer/A
xogatoƚar/A
inxónxer/A
rindovenar/A
skonđurar/A
ekonomixar/A
rientrar/A
evínŧer/A
exuƚar/A
sfadigar/A
falivar/A	po:verb
fameƚiarixar/A
fatalidar/A
faveƚar/A
paƚifegar/A
defénder/A
inferetar/A
enfiar/A
fiaskedar/A
fiƚar/A
afinar/A
sfiorexar/A
afitar/A
desfogar/A
folgorar/A
deformar/A
refornir/A
fradeƚar/A
infrànđer/A
desfratar/A
sfredir/A
sfríder/A
fruar/A
sfulminar/A
futurixar/A
ingaƚar/A
ingalonar/A
xgangir/A
xgarbeƚar/A
garxar/A
ingetar/A
ingoƚoxir/A
dexgoŧar/A
granir/A
granpar/A
agravar/A
xgrénxer/A
grintar/A
ingrisoƚir/A
ingrosir/A
xguainar/A
xguilŧar/A
deidratar/A
infornar/A
inproviđar/A
subintrar/A
isar/A
ɉasar/A
ɉeƚar/A
xɉinŧar/A
xɉosar/A
ɉustar/A
inkaecar/A
inkalir/A
skalkañar/A
deskalsar/A
inkamuŧar/A
kànder/A
kanpionar/A
skapar/A
inkaprisiar/A
inkaregar/A
karolar/A
inkartelar/A
inkastelar/A
inkatijar/A
prekasar/A
skavaleŧar/A
skekedar/A
akòɉer/A
kolar/A	po:verb
inkoƚorar/A
inkomensiar/A
konfuxionar/A
rekonóser/A
inkontrar/A
kopar/A
skoraɉir/A
inkorđar/A
skorporar/A
inkotolar/A
rekovèrđer/A
skrepolar/A
krioƚar/A
krostolinar/A
inkuadrar/A
kuèrđer/A
kukar/A
kuñar/A
kusoƚar/A
xlanegar/A
xlansar/A
xlargixar/A
laudar/A
ƚèxer/A
xlénđer/A
ƚeterar/A
libar/A
dexligar/A
sotoƚinear/A
ƚiveƚar/A
proƚongar/A
loxar/A
lusar/A
inmacar/A
malgamar/A
mandar/A
manixar/A
maraveɉar/A
xmaronar/A
inmascar/A
xmatar/A
inmaŧetar/A
destramedar/A
mejorar/A
xmentir/A
merkantixar/A
skométer/A
minaŧar/A
inmixerir/A
mokajar/A
moltonar/A
remontar/A
morbidir/A
dexmorŧar/A
promòver/A
muƚar/A
mutegar/A
xnaređar/A
nebiar/A
nikar/A
noleđar/A
renovar/A
ñaolar/A
ocar/A
inokular/A
ondeđar/A
oparar/A
organexar/A
inosar/A
inpacolar/A
despaɉar/A
inpaƚar/A
palixar/A
inpanar/A
spantaxar/A
parir/A
desparedar/A
partesipar/A
paskolar/A
pastrocar/A
despaŧar/A
spaviar/A
despegoƚar/A
spelegar/A
spenasar/A
peneƚar/A
inpeñar/A
perletar/A
despetar/A
despetoƚar/A
inpesolatar/A
traxpiantar/A
inpicolar/A
spikolir/A
pionbar/A
spironar/A
piŧegar/A
aplaudir/A
inpolmonar/A
pomegar/A
skonpóner/A
spontedar/A
pónxer/A
straportar/A
spotacar/A
pregar/A
preŧiar/A
procesar/A
providar/A
inpupar/A
pusar/A
ragar/A
ranɉar/A
ransiñar/A
realiđar/A
rekuiđir/A
remar/A
rexíster/A
irisar/A
robakiar/A
surogar/A
ronkir/A
rosidar/A
ruđenir/A
ruinar/A
ruxar/A
sakexar/A
saldar/A
saltelar/A
saorir/A
saxar/A
scopar/A
resekar/A
suseguir/A
deskonseɉar/A
semenar/A
konsentir/A
desepeƚir/A
malsestar/A
sibiƚar/A
trasimar/A
sisolar/A
skaƚinar/A
skarpiar/A
inskatolar/A
skinŧar/A
skorlar/A
skrisar/A
soasar/A
solajar/A
solŧar/A
soñar/A
sotiliđar/A
spalmar/A
spasiar/A
spetar/A
despigolar/A
spoɉar/A
spuar/A
destafar/A
stankejar/A
restaurar/A
istigar/A
sostituir/A
istolidir/A
stranxir/A
restrénđer/A
stronŧar/A
istuar/A
sturar/A
insultar/A
sustar/A
tajar/A
intakar/A
tanbuxar/A
taređar/A
tastedar/A
tavernar/A
desténder/A
intenperar/A
stentar/A
trateñir/A
detéñer/A
terasar/A
testemoniar/A
tiraneɉar/A
stokixar/A
tonbolar/A
topar/A
torniar/A
kontòrxer/A
astràer/A
trakejar/A
stransir/A
tratedar/A
trebiar/A
triboƚar/A
intristar/A
troñar/A
intujar/A
inŧakolar/A
ŧaratanar/A
retroŧéder/A
ŧenɉar/A
inŧeñar/A
deŧernir/A
insetar/A
ŧigar/A
simar/A
sioƚar/A
sirkuir/A
solar/A
ŧotiñar/A
uƚuƚar/A
abuxar/A
vagejar/A
xvanir/A
varar/A
desprovéder/A
prevénder/A
soraveñir/A
vergidar/A
pervèrter/A
invilir/A
invisiar/A
‘oƚer/A
skonvòlxer/A
xborñar/A
xirandolar/A
xoƚar/A
kantonar/A
diferenŧiar/A
ralentar/A
funŧiar/A
jòler/A
xbrankar/A
xmentegar/A
arđiñar/A
dexbroketar/A
